West Virginia, session 2026, HB5031.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12A. FATALITY AND MORTALITY REVIEW TEAM. §61-12A-3. Access to information; other agencies of government required to cooperate. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code to the contrary, the Fatality and Mortality Review Team may request information and records as necessary to carry out its responsibilities. Records and information that may be requested under this section include:(1) Medical, dental, and mental health records, including vaccination records in death investigations;(2) Substance abuse records to the extent allowed by federal law; and(3) Information and records maintained by any state, county, and local government agency, except as provided in §61-12A-2(b) of this code. (b) State, county, and local government agencies shall provide the Fatality and Mortality Review Team with any information requested in writing.